Maine, session 132, LD1365.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1542, sub-§2, ¶O is enacted to read:
O. Smoking of adult use cannabis or adult use cannabis products is not prohibited in a
cannabis hospitality lounge locally licensed or approved pursuant to Title 28-B, section
401, subsection 4.
Sec. 2. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §3, is
amended to read:
10. Cannabis establishment. "Cannabis establishment" means a cultivation facility,
a products manufacturing facility, a testing facility, a cannabis store or a sample collector
licensed under this chapter. "Cannabis establishment" does not include a cannabis
hospitality lounge.
Sec. 3. 28-B MRSA §102-A, sub-§12-A is enacted to read:
12-A. Cannabis hospitality lounge. "Cannabis hospitality lounge" means a location
that is open to members of the public who are 21 years of age or older and is locally licensed
or approved pursuant to section 401, subsection 4 where persons 21 years of age or older
may consume adult use cannabis, adult use cannabis products and edible products that do
not contain cannabis.
Sec. 4. 28-B MRSA §103, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 6, §§13 to 15, is
further amended to read:
1. Unauthorized conduct. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, in the rules
adopted pursuant to this chapter, in chapter 3 or in the Maine Medical Use of Cannabis Act
or, as specifically authorized pursuant to a license issued under this chapter, or, in the case
of a cannabis hospitality lounge, as specifically authorized pursuant to a local license or
approval issued for that lounge pursuant to section 401, subsection 4, a person may not:
A. Cultivate, manufacture or test cannabis or cannabis products;
B. Sell or offer for sale cannabis or cannabis products;
C. Use, possess, transport, transfer, furnish or purchase cannabis or cannabis products;
or
D. Sell, offer for sale or furnish any products containing tobacco, nicotine or synthetic
nicotine to any person without first obtaining a retail tobacco license in accordance
with Title 22, chapter 262‑A.
Sec. 5. 28-B MRSA §104-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §5, is amended
by enacting at the end a new paragraph to read:
Notwithstanding any provision of this Title to the contrary, the office may not impose
any licensing or other requirements on the operation of a cannabis hospitality lounge locally
licensed or approved pursuant to section 401, subsection 4 or initiate any investigative or
enforcement action against the operator of such lounge based on a violation of a provision
of this Title or the rules adopted pursuant to this Title.
Sec. 6. 28-B MRSA §401, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1634(01)

4. Local approval of cannabis hospitality lounges. Notwithstanding any provision
of this Title or other provision of law to the contrary, a municipality may adopt an ordinance
providing licensing or other approval requirements applicable to cannabis hospitality
lounges within the municipality, which may include, but are not limited to, provisions
establishing a municipal licensing fee schedule pursuant to Title 30-A, section 3702.
A. In the case of a town, plantation or township within the unorganized and
deorganized areas, the legislative body of the town or plantation or, in the case of a
township, the county commissioners of the county in which the township is located
may provide for the licensing or other approval of cannabis hospitality lounges within
the town, plantation or township.
B. A cannabis hospitality lounge that receives a local license or approval in accordance
with this subsection may operate as a cannabis hospitality lounge without the need for
additional state licensing or approvals.
Sec. 7. 28-B MRSA §1501, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 409, Pt. A, §6
and amended by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
A. A person 21 years of age or older may consume cannabis or cannabis products only
if that person is:
(1) In a private residence, including curtilage; or
(2) On private property, not generally accessible by the public, and the person is
explicitly permitted to consume cannabis or cannabis products on the property by
the owner of the property.; or
(3) On the premises of a cannabis hospitality lounge locally licensed or approved
pursuant to section 401, subsection 4.